Utah statutes.
23-19-39.   Additional appropriation.

The division each year shall request the Legislature to appropriate from the General Fund in the appropriations act, for deposit in the Wildlife Resources Restricted Account, a sum equal to the total of the fees, as determined by the previous year's license sales, that would have otherwise been collected for fishing licenses had full fees been paid by those 65 years of age or older or those who received free fishing privileges under the provisions of Section 23-19-14 or 23-19-36.



Amended by Chapter 128, 1999 General Session

